Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-14,109
Removal of abandoned mobile home; conditions.

(1) If a tenant abandons a mobile home on a mobile home space, the mobile home shall not be removed from the mobile home space by the tenant or his or her agent without:

(a) A signed written authorization from the landlord granting clearance for removal, showing all money due and owing paid in full;

(b) Compliance with the Disposition of Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act; or

(c) An agreement reached with the legal owner and the landlord.

(2) A mobile home shall be considered to be abandoned if the tenant has defaulted in rent and has, by absence of at least thirty days or by words or actions, reasonably indicated an intention not to continue the tenancy.

(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a landlord from removing an abandoned mobile home from the mobile home space and placing it in storage at the owner's expense or from utilizing any other legal remedy.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 60;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 26;

Laws 2026, LB834, § 8.
July 18, 2026
Disposition of Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act, see section 69-2301.